Illinois, session 104th, HB5280.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Municipal Water Infrastructure 8Sustainability Fund. 9    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 10Section 6z-149 as follows: 11    (30 ILCS 105/6z-149 new)12    Sec. 6z-149. The Municipal Water Infrastructure 13Sustainability Fund. The Municipal Water Infrastructure 14Sustainability Fund is created as a special fund in the State 15treasury. Subject to appropriation, moneys in the Municipal 16Water Infrastructure Sustainability Fund shall be used by the 17Environmental Protection Agency to provide dedicated, ongoing 18financial support to water and wastewater systems owned by 19municipalities to allow the water and wastewater systems to 20make capital repairs, upgrades, and improvements with the goal 21of preserving public ownership of the water and wastewater   HB5280- 2 -LRB104 20201 RTM 33652 b1systems and preventing forced privatization due to 2unaffordable infrastructure costs.